en: Plain corn flakes fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Pétales de maïs natures enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Obične kukuruzne pahuljice obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Paprasti kukurūzų dribsniai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Plain corn flakes not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Corn flakes natures non enrichis en vitamines et minéraux, Pétales de maïs natures non enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Obične kukuruzne pahuljice koje nisu obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Paprasti kukurūzų dribsniai nepapildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Sugar iced corn flakes
fr: Corn flakes glacés au sucre, Corn flakes sucrés, Pétales de maïs sucrées
hr: Šećerne kukuruzne pahuljice
lt: Cukruoti kukurūzų dribsniai

en: Sugar iced corn flakes not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Corn flakes glacés au sucre non enrichis en vitamines et minéraux, Pétales de maïs glacés au sucre non enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Šećerne kukuruzne pahuljice koje nisu obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Cukruoti kukurūzų dribsniai nepapildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Sugar iced corn flakes fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Corn flakes glacés au sucre enrichis en vitamines et minéraux, Pétales de maïs glacés au sucre enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Šećerom ledene kukuruzne pahuljice obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Cukruoti kukurūzų dribsniai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Rolled oats, Oat flakes, Oatmeal, Oatmeal flakes
bg: Овесени ядки
de: Haferflocken
es: Copos de avena
fi: kaurahiutaleet
fr: Flocons d’avoine, Flocons d'avoine
hr: zobene pahuljice
it: Fiocchi d'avena
ja: ロールドオーツ, オートミール
lt: Avižiniai dribsniai
nl: Havermoutvlokken, Havermouten
pl: Płatki owsiane
pt: Flocos de aveia
ru: Овсяные хлопья, Хлопья овсяные

en: Rolled oats (small)
fr: Flocons d'avoine (petit)
nl: Havermoutvlokken (klein)

en: Pre-cooked oat flakes
fr: Flocons d'avoine précuits
hr: Prethodno kuhane zobene pahuljice
lt: Iš anksto virti avižiniai dribsniai
nl: Voorgekookte havervlokken

en: Pre-cooked oat flakes with sugar
fr: Flocons d'avoine précuits sucrés

en: Cooked oat flakes, Boiled oat flakes, Oat flakes cooked in water
fr: Flocons d'avoine bouillis, Flocons d'avoine cuits à l'eau
hr: Kuhane zobene pahuljice
lt: Virti avižiniai dribsniai, Vandenyje virti avižiniai dribsniai
nl: Gekookte havervlokken

en: Millet flakes
de: Hirseflocken
es: Copos de mijo
fr: Flocons de millet
hr: Pahuljice prosa
lt: Sorų dribsniai
nl: Gierstvlokken

en: Blend of rolled cereal flakes
fr: Mélanges de flocons de céréales, flocons 5 céréales

en: Mixed cereal flakes
ca: Barreja de flocs de cereals
de: gemischte Getreideflocken
es: Mezclas de copos de cereales
fi: hiutalesekoitus
fr: Pétales multicéréales
hr: Miješane žitne pahuljice
hu: Vegyes gabonapelyhek
it: Fiocchi multicereali, Fiocchi di cereali misti
lt: Įvairių javų dribsniai
nl: Gemengde granenvlokken
pt: Flocos de cereais em mistura
ru: Мультизерновые хлопья

en: Quinoa flakes
de: Quinoaflocken
es: Copos de quinoa
fr: Flocons de quinoa
hr: Pahuljice kvinoje
lt: Quinoa dribsniai
nl: Quinoavlokken

en: Rice flakes
de: Reisflocken
es: Copos de arroz
fi: Riisihiutaleet
fr: Flocons de riz
hr: Rižine pahuljice
lt: Ryžių dribsniai
nl: Rijstvlokken

en: Rye flakes
de: Roggenflocken
es: Copos de centeno
fi: Ruishiutaleet
fr: Flocons de seigle
hr: Ražene pahuljice
it: Fiocchi di segale
lt: Rugių dribsniai
nl: Roggevlokken

en: Teff flakes
de: Teff-Flocken, Zwerghirseflocken
es: Copos de teff
fr: Flocons de teff
hr: Teff pahuljice
lt: Teff dribsniai
nl: Teffvlokken

en: Rolled spelt flakes, Spelt flakes
de: Dinkelflocken
es: Copos de espelta
fi: Spelttihiutaleet
fr: Flocons d'épeautre
hr: Uvaljane pahuljice od pira
lt: Speltos dribsniai
nl: Speltvlokken

en: Extruded spelt flakes
fr: Pétales d'épeautre

en: Rolled wheat flakes, Wheat flakes
de: Weizenflocken
es: Copos de trigo
fi: Vehnähiutaleet
fr: Flocons de blé
hr: Valjane pšenične pahuljice
lt: Kviečių dribsniai
nl: Graanvlokken